Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3005.02
Supervision, defined.

Supervision means the ready availability of the supervising podiatrist for consultation and collaboration on the activities of the physician assistant.

Laws 2020, LB755, § 21.